North Carolina statutes. Chapter 148. State Prison System.
Article 8. Compensation to Persons Erroneously Convicted of Felonies.

§ 148-82.
Provision for compensation.

Any person who, having been convicted of a felony and having been imprisoned therefor in a State prison of this State, and who was thereafter or who shall hereafter be granted a pardon of innocence by the Governor upon the grounds that the crime with which the person was charged either was not committed at all or was not committed by that person, may as hereinafter provided present by petition a claim against the State for the pecuniary loss sustained by the person through his or her erroneous conviction and imprisonment, provided the petition is presented within five years of the granting of the pardon.

Any person who, having been convicted of a felony after pleading not guilty or nolo contendere and having been imprisoned therefor in a State prison of this State, and who is determined to be innocent of all charges and against whom the charges are dismissed pursuant to

G.S. 15A-1469

may as hereinafter provided present by petition a claim against the State for the pecuniary loss sustained by the person through his or her erroneous conviction and imprisonment, provided the petition is presented within five years of the date that the dismissal of the charges is entered by the three-judge panel under

G.S. 15A-1469

.

History.

1947, c. 465, s. 1; 1997-388, s. 1; 2010-171, s. 3; 2012-7, s. 11.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-171, s. 3, effective August 2, 2010, added the subsection (a) designation and subsection (b).

Legal Periodicals.

For brief comment on this Article, see 25 N.C.L. Rev. 403 (1947).

§ 148-83.
Form, requisites and contents of petition; nature of hearing.

Such petition shall be addressed to the Industrial Commission, and must include a full statement of the facts upon which the claim is based, verified in the manner provided for verifying complaints in civil actions, and it may be supported by affidavits substantiating such claim. Upon its presentation the Industrial Commission shall fix a time and a place for a hearing, and shall mail notice to the claimant, and shall notify the Attorney General, at least 15 days before the time fixed therefor.

History.

1947, c. 465, s. 2; 1963, c. 1174, s. 4; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1997-388, s. 2.

§ 148-84.
Evidence; action by Industrial Commission; payment and amount of compensation.

At the hearing the claimant may introduce evidence in the form of affidavits or testimony to support the claim, and the Attorney General may introduce counter affidavits or testimony in refutation. If the Industrial Commission finds from the evidence that the claimant received a pardon of innocence for the reason that the crime was not committed at all, received a pardon of innocence for the reason that the crime was not committed by the claimant, or that the claimant was determined to be innocent of all charges by a three-judge panel under

G.S. 15A-1469

and also finds that the claimant was imprisoned and has been vindicated in connection with the alleged offense for which he or she was imprisoned, the Industrial Commission shall award to the claimant an amount equal to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each year or the pro rata amount for the portion of each year of the imprisonment actually served, including any time spent awaiting trial. However, (i) in no event shall the compensation, including the compensation provided in subsection (c) of this section, exceed a total amount of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000), and (ii) a claimant is not entitled to compensation for any portion of a prison sentence during which the claimant was also serving a concurrent sentence for conviction of a crime other than the one for which the pardon of innocence was granted.The Director of the Budget shall pay the amount of the award to the claimant out of the Contingency and Emergency Fund, or out of any other available State funds. The Industrial Commission shall give written notice of its decision to all parties concerned. The determination of the Industrial Commission shall be subject to judicial review upon appeal of the claimant or the State according to the provisions and procedures set forth in Article 31 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

Reserved.

In addition to the compensation provided under subsection (a) of this section, the Industrial Commission shall determine the extent to which incarceration has deprived a claimant of educational or training opportunities and, based upon those findings, may award the following compensation for loss of life opportunities:

Job skills training for at least one year through an appropriate State program; and

Expenses for tuition and fees at any public North Carolina community college or constituent institution of The University of North Carolina for any degree or program of the claimant’s choice that is available from one or more of the applicable institutions. Claimants are also entitled to assistance in meeting any admission standards or criteria required at any of those institutions, including assistance in satisfying requirements for a certificate of equivalency of completion of secondary education. A claimant may apply for aid under this subdivision within 10 years of the claimant’s release from incarceration, and aid shall continue for up to a total of five years when initiated within the 10-year period, provided the claimant makes satisfactory progress in the courses or degree program in which the claimant is enrolled.

History.

1947, c. 465, s. 3; 1963, c. 1174, s. 4; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1997-388, s. 3; 2001-424, s. 25.12(a); 2008-173, ss. 1, 2; 2009-570, s. 24; 2010-171, s. 4.